Utah statutes.
53A-21-501.   State contribution to capital outlay programs.
(1)  As an ongoing appropriation subject to future budget constraints, there
is appropriated from the Uniform School Fund for fiscal year 2009-10,
$22,499,700 to the State Board of Education for the capital outlay programs
created in this chapter.
(2)  Of the monies appropriated in Subsection (1), the State Board of
Education shall distribute:
(a)  $19,568,800 in accordance with the Capital Outlay Foundation Program
pursuant to Section 53A-21-202; and
(b)  $2,930,900 in accordance with the Capital Outlay Enrollment Growth
Program pursuant to Section 53A-21-302.
